src/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc
!! Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
!! else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
!! created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
!! to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
!! one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
!! compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

LEXICON Adposition
räjja PO_ ;
mieʹldd PO_ ;
diõtt PO_ ;
årra PO_ ;


!! !!!Skolt Saami adverbs

LEXICON Adverb
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' contains adverbs.
!! They are taken from [http://www.uta.fi/~km56049/same/skolt/koltansaame.html]

ââlda ADV_ "nearby" ; !!= * @CODE@
ââʹn ADV_ "now" ;  !!= * @CODE@
ålggan ADV_ "outside" ;  !!= * @CODE@
åålǥas ADV_ "to outside" ;  !!= * @CODE@
eiʹdde ADV_ "juuri" ;
jâđđa ADV_ "tomorrow" ;
jåhtta ADV_ "yesterday" ;
juʹn ADV_ "jo" ;
kuäʹss ADV_ "milloin" ;
mââimõsân ADV_ " lopultakin" ;
sizz ADV_ "to inside" ;
sõrgg ADV_ "pian" ;
taa ADV_ "here" ;
taʹnni ADV_ "this year" ;
teimma ADV_ "last year" ;
täʹst ADV_ "here" ;
teʹl ADV_ "silloin" ;
tuâl-aa ADV_ "kauan sitten" ;
toʹben ADV_ "siellä" ;
tok ADV_ "sinne" ;
tääiʹben ADV_ "täällä" ;
tääʹl ADV_ "now" ;
aalǥâst ADV_ "alusta" ;

!! !!!Skolt Saami Conjunctions 


LEXICON Conjunction  
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' lists the conjunction
ja CC_ "and" ;              !!= ** @CODE@
da CC_ "and" ;         !!= ** @CODE@
di CC_ "and" ;
de CC_ "and" ;
avi CC_ "or / tai, vai" ;
leʹbe CC_ "or / eli" ;
leʹbe:lebe CC_ "or / eli" ; ! sub
leašša CC_ "but / mutta, vaan" ;
a CC_ "but / vaan" ;
nâga CC_ "but / vaan" ;
peʹce CC_ "but / vaan" ;
seâša CC_ "but / vaan" ;

!tail "or"



!! !!!Skolt Saami Interjections 


LEXICON ij         
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' gives the tag __+Interj__
+Interj: # ;           


LEXICON Interjection   
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' lists the interjections
ai ij ;            !!= * @CODE@
beâddaa ij "voi kauhistus" ;
nä ij "no" ;
no ij "no" ;
nu ij "no" ;
ne ij "no" ;
näʹde ij "no sitten" ;
oi ij "oi" ;
tiõrv ij "hei" ;
vot ij "no niin" ;
vuõi ij "voi" ;
vui ij "voi" ;
voi ij "voi" ;
oi ij "voi" ;


!! !!!Skolt Saami Numerals

LEXICON num      
!! Lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' gives the tag __+Num__
+Num: # ;


!! !!!Skolt Saami Particles


LEXICON Particle 
!! !!List of particles in the lexicon @LEXNAME@

ges PCLE_ ; !!= @CODE@

!! !!unclear whether these are really particles
joo PCLE_ ; !!from a song


!! !!!Propernoun lexicon, Skolt Sámi specific names 


LEXICON ProperNoun
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' lists the proper nouns


!! !!First part of complex names WHERE DO THESE COMe FROM?? 2015-09-01

!Uʹcc FirstTag ;
!Joohan FirstTag ;
!Jõnn FirstTag ;


!! !!Ordinary person names

Oʹlssi PROP_ ;
Onsim PROP_ ;

!! !!Ordinary place names



!! !!Ordinary misc names

Interreg PROP_ ;

!! !!!Subjunctions
